Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 44. Establishing Disputed Boundaries

38-44-101.
When action may be brought.

When one or more owners of land, the corners and boundaries of which are lost, destroyed, or in dispute, desire to have the same established, they may bring an action in the district court of the county where such lost, disputed, or destroyed corners or boundaries or parts thereof are situated against the owners of the other tracts which would be affected by the determination or establishment thereof, to have such corners or boundaries ascertained and permanently established. If any public road is likely to be affected thereby, the proper county shall be made a party defendant.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 286, § 1.

Code 08:

§ 297.

Code 21:

§ 298.

Code 35:

§ 298.

CRS 53:

§ 118-11-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-11-1.

38-44-102.
Notice.

Notice of such action shall be given as in other cases and if the defendants or any of them are nonresidents of the state, or unknown, they may be served by publication as provided by law.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 287, § 2.

Code 08:

§ 298.

Code 21:

§ 299.

Code 35:

§ 299.

CRS 53:

§ 118-11-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-11-2.

38-44-103.
Pleadings - trial of issues.

The action shall be a civil action, and the only necessary pleadings therein shall be the petition of plaintiff describing the land involved and, insofar as may be, the interest of the respective party and asking that certain corners and boundaries therein described, as accurately as may be, be established. Either the plaintiff or the defendant, by proper plea, may put in issue the fact that certain alleged boundaries or corners are true ones or that such have been recognized and acquiesced in by the parties or their grantors for a period of twenty consecutive years, which issue may be tried before a commission appointed in the discretion of the court.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 287, § 3.

Code 08:

§ 299.

Code 21:

§ 300.

Code 35:

§ 300.

CRS 53:

§ 118-11-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-11-3.

38-44-104.
Commissioners - county surveyor.

The court in which said action is brought may appoint the county surveyor or, if there is no county surveyor or if the court deems it in the best interest of the parties, shall appoint a commission of one or more disinterested surveyors who, at a date and place fixed by the court in the order of appointment, shall proceed to locate the lost, destroyed, or disputed corners and boundaries.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 287, § 4.

Code 08:

§ 300.

Code 21:

§ 301.

Code 35:

§ 301.

CRS 53:

§ 118-11-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-11-4.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 479, § 5, effective July 1.

38-44-105.
Oath or affirmation - assistants.

The commissioners so appointed shall take an oath or affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101 and shall have power to appoint all necessary assistants.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 287, § 5.

Code 08:

§ 301.

Code 21:

§ 302.

Code 35:

§ 302.

CRS 53:

§ 118-11-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-11-5.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended,(HB 18-1138), ch. 88, p. 704, § 48, effective August 8.

38-44-106.
Hearing.

At the time and in the manner specified in the order of court, the commission shall proceed to locate said boundaries and corners and for that purpose may take the testimony of witnesses as to where the true boundaries and corners are located; and, when so ascertained, the commission shall mark the same by erecting or putting down permanent and fixed monuments at all corners so located. In its report to the court, the commission shall file a map or plat showing all monuments, lines, and any other evidences or witness marks that will more nearly identify the corners and, if that issue is presented, shall also take testimony as to whether the boundaries or corners alleged to have been recognized and acquiesced in for twenty years or more have in fact been recognized and acquiesced in. If it finds affirmatively on such issue, it shall incorporate the same into the report to the court.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 287, § 6.

Code 08:

§ 302.

Code 21:

§ 303.

Code 35:

§ 303.

CRS 53:

§ 118-11-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-11-6.

38-44-107.
Adjournments and report.

The proceedings may be adjourned by the commission from time to time as may be necessary, but the survey and location of the corners and boundaries must be complete and the report thereof filed with the clerk of the court at least ten days before the first day of the term next following that of its appointment, unless the court appointing it makes an order for an earlier report.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 288, § 7.

Code 08:

§ 303.

Code 21:

§ 304.

Code 35:

§ 304.

CRS 53:

§ 118-11-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-11-7.

38-44-108.
Exceptions - hearing.

At the term of court after such report is filed, any party interested may file exceptions thereto within ten days from the date the report is filed with the clerk, but if in term time, then within three days after the same is filed, and the court shall hear and determine them, hearing evidence in addition to that reported by the commission if necessary, and may approve or modify such report or again refer the matter to the same or another commission for further report.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 288, § 8.

Code 08:

§ 304.

Code 21:

§ 305.

Code 35:

§ 305.

CRS 53:

§ 118-11-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-11-8.

38-44-109.
Corners and boundaries established.

The corners and boundaries finally established by the court in proceedings under this article, or an appeal therefrom, shall be binding upon all the parties, their heirs and assigns, as the corners and boundaries that have been lost, destroyed, or in dispute; but if it is found that the boundaries and corners alleged to have been recognized and acquiesced in for twenty years have been so recognized and acquiesced in, such recognized boundaries and corners shall be permanently established. The court order or decree shall be recorded in the grantor-grantee index of the real property records of the county or counties in which the land lies.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 288, § 9.

Code 08:

§ 305.

Code 21:

§ 306.

Code 35:

§ 306.

CRS 53:

§ 118-11-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-11-9.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended,(HB 10-1085), ch. 95, p. 326, § 8, effective August 11.

38-44-110.
Appeal.

There shall be no appeal in such proceedings, except from final judgment of the court taken in the manner that other appeals are taken, and no appeal shall be taken after three months from the final order of the court.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 288, § 10.

Code 08:

§ 306.

Code 21:

§ 307.

Code 35:

§ 307.

CRS 53:

§ 118-11-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-11-10.

38-44-111.
Costs.

The costs in the proceedings shall be taxed as the court thinks just and shall be a lien on the land or interest therein owned by the party or parties against whom they are taxed insofar as such lands are involved in the proceedings.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 288, § 11.

Code 08:

§ 307.

Code 21:

§ 308.

Code 35:

§ 308.

CRS 53:

§ 118-11-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-11-11.

38-44-112.
Agreements.

Any uncertain line, uncertain corner, or uncertain boundary of an existing parcel of land that is recorded in the real estate records in the office of the clerk and recorder for the county where the land is located and that is in dispute may be determined and permanently established by written agreement of all parties thereby affected, signed and acknowledged by each as required for conveyances of real estate, clearly designating the same, and accompanied by a map or plat thereof that shall be recorded as an instrument affecting real estate, and shall be binding upon their heirs, successors, and assigns. If the map or plat is prepared by a licensed professional land surveyor, monuments shall be set for any line, corner, or boundary included in the agreement.

History.

Source:
L. 07:

P. 288, § 12.

Code 08:

§ 308.

Code 21:

§ 309.

Code 35:

§ 309.

CRS 53:

§ 118-11-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-11-12.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 294, § 5, effective August 3.

38-44-113.
Establishment of boundary corner.

The establishment of a boundary corner through acquiescence confirmed by a court of competent jurisdiction, or by written agreement pursuant to section 38-44-112, shall not alter the location or validity of any existing or properly restored public land survey monument in the vicinity. Such existing or properly restored public land survey monument may be used to control future land surveys in the region when such surveys are not related to the boundary corner established by acquiescence or agreement.

History.

Source:
L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1629, § 5, effective July 1.